src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V0_KÂÂʹǨǨED !!= * @CODE@ kââʹǩǩed:kââkk

! 1. VERBS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE Ind.Prs.Sg3 (2009: ???)
! 1.3 Inf in palatalization + ed (vowel shift)
!   Raised: Inf, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Imprt.Sg2, Pot.Sg3
!   Lowered: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Imprt.Sg3
! 1.3.1 Has Palatalization
! 1.3.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
!   Palatalized: Inf, Ind.Prs.Pl3, Ind.Prt.Pl3, Pot.Sg3
!   Not Palatalized: Ind.Prs.Sg3, Imprt.Sg2, Imprt.Sg3
! 1.3.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
! 1.3.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
! 1.3.1[1].1.1[231] (Diphthong + Consonant and Consonant Geminate alternation)
!   Strong grade: 
!   Extra strong grade: 
!   Weak grade: 
! FORMS
! (1)  Inf: kââʹǩǩed
! (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: kââkk
! (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: kââʹǩˈǩe
! (4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: kõõʹǩˈǩe
! (5)  Ind.Imprt.Sg2: kââʹjj
! (6)  Ind.Pot.Sg3: kõõʹjjež
! (7)  Imprt.Sg3: kââǥǥas
! (8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: kõkku 
! (9)  Imprt.Pl3: kâkkaz
! (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: kâkˈkaz
! (10) Allegro for incoative: kâʹj»
! (11)  Ger.Temp.PxSg3: kââʹjjeeʹstes
! * Yaml: __V-kaakked__
! kââʹǩǩed:kââkk
! Strong grade in penultimate syllable
:%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ; !1
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; !2
+Imprt+Pl3:%^VV2V%>az K ;
:%^KK2GG VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PAL%>e K ; !3
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ; !4
:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^KK2GG VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !5
+Pot+Sg3:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^KK2GG%>âž   K ; !6
+Imprt+Sg3:%^CC2C%>as K ; !7
:%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !8
 !9V

+Der/škueʹtted:%^PAL%^CC2C»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;



LEXICON V_PUEʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ pueʹtted:puätt
+V: V0_PUEʹTTED ;
LEXICON IV_PUEʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ pueʹtted:puätt
+V+IV: V0_PUEʹTTED ;
LEXICON TV_PUEʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ pueʹtted:puätt
+V+TV: V0_PUEʹTTED ;
LEXICON V0_PUEʹTTED !!= * @CODE@ pueʹtted:puätt

! Stem is Strong
! Diphthong
! Vowel shift
! FORMS

!! Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ;		!!= * @CODE@ (1) puẹʹtted 
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; 	     		!!= * @CODE@ (2) puätt
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PAL%^CC2CCC%>e K ;     !!= * @CODE@ (3) puäʹtˈte
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2CCC%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) pueʹtˈte
:%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ%^PAL%^CC2CCC%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) puõʹtˈte
!!  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Weak-StableV-Palatalization
:%^PAL%^CC2C VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) puäʹđ-
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

!! Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (6 pueʹđež
+Use/NG:%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ%^PAL%^CC2C%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (6 puõʹđež
:%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ%^PAL%^CC2C VSUF-IND-PRT-SG3-PL1-PL2_ ; !!= * @CODE@ ( puõʹđi
+Pot+Sg3:%^PAL%^CC2C%>ež   K ; !!= * @CODE@ (6   puäʹđež
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

!! Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:%^CC2C%> VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) puäđ-
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3
+Use/NG:%^PAL%^CC2C%> VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5 ?2 ?7) puäʹđ-

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8 puõttu
:%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8 puåttu
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization (9)
:%^CC2CCC VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ;  !!= * @CODE@ puätˈtaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

!! Allegro (10)
+Der/škueʹtted:%^VOWLower%^PAL%^CC2C%>e»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;


LEXICON V_JIẸʹLLED !!= * @CODE@ jieʹlled:jeäll
+V: V0_JIẸʹLLED ;
LEXICON IV_JIẸʹLLED !!= * @CODE@ jieʹlled:jeäll
+V+IV: V0_JIẸʹLLED ;
LEXICON TV_JIẸʹLLED !!= * @CODE@ jieʹlled:jeäll
+V+TV: V0_JIẸʹLLED ;
LEXICON V0_JIẸʹLLED !!= * @CODE@ jieʹlled:jeäll

!! like: V_PIẸʹǨǨED
! Stem is Strong
! Diphthong
! Vowel shift
! FORMS

!! Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PALẸ%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ;		!!= * @CODE@ (1) jiẹʹlled 
!! V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
!! Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

!! Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
: VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; 	     		!!= * @CODE@ (2) jeäll
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PAL%^CC2CCC%>e K ;     !!= * @CODE@ (3) jeäʹlˈle
!! +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2CCC%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) jieʹlˈle
+Use/NG:%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ%^PAL%^CC2CCC%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) jiõʹlˈle
!!  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

!! Weak-StableV-Palatalization
:%^PAL%^CC2C VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) jeäʹl-
!! Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
!!   Ger.Temp.PxSg3: jeäʹleeʹstes

!! Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
:%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (6 jieʹlež

:%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ%^PAL%^CC2C VSUF-IND-PRT-SG3-PL1-PL2_ ; !!= * @CODE@ ( puõʹđi
+Pot+Sg3:%^PAL%^CC2C%>ež   K ; !!= * @CODE@ (6   puäʹđež
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

!! Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
:%^CC2C%> VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) jeäl-
!! Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3
+Use/NG:%^PAL%^CC2C%> VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (5 ?2 ?7) puäʹđ-

!! ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
:%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ; !!= * @CODE@ (8 jiâllu
!! Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

!! ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization (9)
:%^CC2CCC VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ;  !!= * @CODE@ jeälˈlaz
!! Imprt+Pl3

!! Allegro (10)
+Der/škueʹtted:%^PAL%^CC2C%>e»škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;

LEXICON V_PIẸʹǨǨED !!= * @CODE@ pieʹǩǩed:peäkk
+V: V0_PIẸʹǨǨED ;
LEXICON IV_PIẸʹǨǨED !!= * @CODE@ pieʹǩǩed:peäkk
+V+IV: V0_PIẸʹǨǨED ;
LEXICON TV_PIẸʹǨǨED !!= * @CODE@ pieʹǩǩed:peäkk
+V+TV: V0_PIẸʹǨǨED ;
