src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
dõnnõõǥškueʹtted:dõnnõõǥškuätt V_PUEʹTTED "" ;
altteeškueʹtted:altteeškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
ašttõlškueʹtted:ašttõlškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
cieʹvved:ceävv V_JIẸʹLLED ;
eʹđškueʹtted:eʹđškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
fiʹttješkueʹtted:fiʹttješkuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
heibškueʹtted:heibškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
håidškueʹtted:håidškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
jaausõđškueʹtted:jaausõđškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
jaukškueʹtted:jaukškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
jeäʹlškueʹtted:jeäʹlškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
jieʹǩǩed:jeäkk V_PIẸʹǨǨED ;
jueʹjjškueʹtted:jueʹjjškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
jueʹjškueʹtted:jueʹjškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
juuǥǥškueʹtted:juuǥǥškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
juŋstõlškueʹtted:juŋstõlškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
juǥškueʹtted:juǥškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
jälsteškueʹtted:jälsteškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
jååʹđteškueʹtted:jååʹđteškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
jååʹđškueʹtted:jååʹđškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
jåʹđškueʹtted:jåʹđškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
kaalškueʹtted:kaalškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
kaaupšeškueʹtted:kaaupšeškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
kaddleškueʹtted:kaddleškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
kaggõđškueʹtted:kaggõđškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
kalškueʹtted:kalškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
kollʼješkueʹtted:kollʼješkuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
kolǥškueʹtted:kolǥškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
koolǥškueʹtted:koolǥškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
koopčõđškueʹtted:koopčõđškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
kueʹddškueʹtted:kueʹddškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
kueʹdškueʹtted:kueʹdškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
kulškueʹtted:kulškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
kuâss-škueʹtted:kuâss-škuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
kuâssškueʹtted:kuâssškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
kuâsškueʹtted:kuâsškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
kuärŋškueʹtted:kuärŋškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
kârrõõđškueʹtted:kârrõõđškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
käʹcǩškueʹtted:käʹcǩškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
kåblškueʹtted:kåblškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
kåʹdškueʹtted:kåʹdškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
kõjškueʹtted:kõjškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
leuʹddješkueʹtted:leuʹddješkuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
loǥškueʹtted:loǥškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
läulškueʹtted:läulškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
metteeškueʹtted:metteeškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
mieʹrreeškueʹtted:mieʹrreeškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
njaaǥǥškueʹtted:njaaǥǥškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
njaǥškueʹtted:njaǥškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
njââlteškueʹtted:njââlteškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
noorteškueʹtted:noorteškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
nordškueʹtted:nordškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
norškueʹtted:norškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
palvškueʹtted:palvškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
peâmškueʹtted:peâmškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
peäggteškueʹtted:peäggteškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
piijškueʹtted:piijškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
pijškueʹtted:pijškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
piâzškueʹtted:piâzškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
piõggškueʹtted:piõggškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
piõgškueʹtted:piõgškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
piʹrǧǧeeškueʹtted:piʹrǧǧeeškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
pleässješkueʹtted:pleässješkuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
poorteškueʹtted:poorteškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
porstõvškueʹtted:porstõvškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
porškueʹtted:porškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
poǥškueʹtted:poǥškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
pueʹldškueʹtted:pueʹldškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
pueʹlškueʹtted:pueʹlškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
pueʹtted:puätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
puuʹštškueʹtted:puuʹštškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
puârneškueʹtted:puârneškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
puäʹđškueʹtted:puäʹđškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
puõʒškueʹtted:puõʒškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
puʹštškueʹtted:puʹštškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
pââʹnškueʹtted:pââʹnškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
pâʹnškueʹtted:pâʹnškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
päkškueʹtted:päkškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
päʹʒškueʹtted:päʹʒškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
påǥsteškueʹtted:påǥsteškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
põlškueʹtted:põlškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
rajškueʹtted:rajškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
reeidškueʹtted:reeidškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
reäǥškueʹtted:reäǥškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
ristškueʹtted:ristškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
riâššʼškueʹtted:riâššʼškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
rämmšeškueʹtted:rämmšeškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
saalkškueʹtted:saalkškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
salkškueʹtted:salkškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
sieʹssed:seäss V_PIẸʹǨǨED ;
siltteeškueʹtted:siltteeškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
siõrtõlškueʹtted:siõrtõlškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
siõrškueʹtted:siõrškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
suudõõđškueʹtted:suudõõđškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
suudškueʹtted:suudškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
sâvškueʹtted:sâvškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
särnškueʹtted:särnškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
tieʹđškueʹtted:tieʹđškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
tiârškueʹtted:tiârškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
tobdškueʹtted:tobdškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
toobdškueʹtted:toobdškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
tuejjeeškueʹtted:tuejjeeškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
tuärškueʹtted:tuärškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
tuäʹrjsteškueʹtted:tuäʹrjsteškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
tuõjjstõlškueʹtted:tuõjjstõlškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
tuõjjstõõlškueʹtted:tuõjjstõõlškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
tuõlddškueʹtted:tuõlddškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
täjškueʹtted:täjškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
tätškueʹtted:tätškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
tääjškueʹtted:tääjškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
uʹvdškueʹtted:uʹvdškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
valmštõlškueʹtted:valmštõlškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
vaʹhttješkueʹtted:vaʹhttješkuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
veärggteškueʹtted:veärggteškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
viârtõlškueʹtted:viârtõlškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
vueiʹnškueʹtted:vueiʹnškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
vueiʹtškueʹtted:vueiʹtškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
vueʹljškueʹtted:vueʹljškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
vueʹrbbâtškueʹtted:vueʹrbbâtškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
vueʹrdškueʹtted:vueʹrdškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
vuâŋŋškueʹtted:vuâŋŋškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
vuäjškueʹtted:vuäjškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
vuännʼneškueʹtted:vuännʼneškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
vuäʹđđješkueʹtted:vuäʹđđješkuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
vuäʹđđstõlškueʹtted:vuäʹđđstõlškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
vuäʹđđstõvškueʹtted:vuäʹđđstõvškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
vuäʹđškueʹtted:vuäʹđškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
vuõjčeškueʹtted:vuõjčeškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
vuõlggleškueʹtted:vuõlggleškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
väʹldškueʹtted:väʹldškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
väʹʒškueʹtted:väʹʒškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
võjškueʹtted:võjškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
âlddneškueʹtted:âlddneškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
âʹbrškueʹtted:âʹbrškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
âʹnškueʹtted:âʹnškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
âʹpsškueʹtted:âʹpsškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
ålvškueʹtted:ålvškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
åskškueʹtted:åskškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
åålvškueʹtted:åålvškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
õlǥškueʹtted:õlǥškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
čaǥškueʹtted:čaǥškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
čieʹǩǩed:čeäkk V_PIẸʹǨǨED ;
čiõpškueʹtted:čiõpškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
čuõmsteškueʹtted:čuõmsteškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
čuõvvneškueʹtted:čuõvvneškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
čõõnškueʹtted:čõõnškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
šorrneškueʹtted:šorrneškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
šõkkneškueʹtted:šõkkneškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
ǩeʹrjjteškueʹtted:ǩeʹrjjteškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
ǩiõrggneškueʹtted:ǩiõrggneškuätt V_PUEʹTTED ;
